Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1509.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7 of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1408, No.113), known as the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Penalties.* * *(c) Catalytic converter penalties.--A person who intentionally possesses a detached catalytic converter that is not affiliated with a commercial account with proper justification commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819